Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5956.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 42504. Within Not later than 10 days after the close of the respective open seasons provided by law for the taking of fur-bearing animals, game birds, and game animals, each person holding that has a license granted under this part shall submit a report to the department stating that states the number and kinds of furs, hides, or pelts of each fur-bearing animal, other than deer, and the plumage, skins, or hides, or parts thereof, of protected game birds and game animals in his or her that person's possession on the last day of the open season for each fur-bearing animal, game bird, and game animal. The reports shall A report submitted under this section must be notarized and sent by registered mail. A person is not required to report the number of deer pelts in the person's possession on the last day of the open season for deer. Sec. 42505. On or before Not later than the tenth day of every month, each person licensed to do business that has a license granted under this part shall make submit a report to the department, on blanks to be furnished by the department, stating that states the number and kinds of raw furs, hides, or pelts of fur-bearing animals, except for deer pelts, or the plumage, skins, or hides, or parts thereof, of protected game birds and game animals purchased or sold during the preceding month, and the name and address of the person from whom purchased and to whom sold. The A report shall submitted under this section must be notarized and sent by registered mail. A person is not required to report the number of deer pelts sold or purchased during any given month.